Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department of State Police, for the  biennium
beginning July 1,  2017, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following
purposes:
(1) Patrol services, criminal
investigations and gaming
enforcement .............................. $155,424,123
(2) Fish and wildlife enforcement ... $ 9,425,292
(3) Forensic services and
State Medical Examiner ............ $ 48,007,227
(4) Administrative services,
agency support, criminal
justice information services
and office of the State Fire
Marshal ..................................... $ 57,964,296
(5) Debt service .............................. $ 358,283
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of  State
Police, for the following purposes:
(1) Patrol services, criminal
investigations and gaming
enforcement .............................. $ 60,338,541
(2) Fish and wildlife enforcement ... $ 24,233,764
(3) Forensic services and
State Medical Examiner ............ $ 1,856,371
(4) Administrative services,
agency support, criminal
justice information services
and office of the State Fire
Enrolled House Bill 5031 (HB 5031-A) Page 1
Marshal ..................................... $ 49,405,725
(5) Debt service .............................. $ 149,632
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Department of State Police for
the following purposes:
(1) Patrol services and criminal
investigations............................ $ 2,119,841
(2) Fish and wildlife enforcement ... $ 2,533,536
(3) Forensic services ...................... $ 2,618,845
(4) Administrative services,
agency support, criminal
justice information services
and office of the State Fire
Marshal ..................................... $ 5,120,134
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$8,309,518 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses  from moneys allocated from the Parks and Natural Resources Fund to
the Department of State Police for fish and wildlife enforcement activities.
SECTION 5. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by House June 28, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 3, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5031 (HB 5031-A) Page 2